Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-202
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) Because of the geographic maldistribution of health care services in Nebraska, it is necessary to utilize the skills and proficiency of existing health professionals more efficiently;

(2) It is necessary to encourage the more effective utilization of the skills of registered nurses by enabling them to perform advanced roles in nursing; and

(3) The purpose of the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act is to encourage registered nurses to perform advanced roles in nursing.

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 37;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-17,132;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 141.